Hawaii statutes.
[§425-173] Transition rules for limited
liability partnerships and foreign limited liability partnerships under prior
law. (a) All entities that were limited liability partnerships registered
under the law in effect on the date preceding July 1, 2000, shall be converted
into and be deemed partnerships that have registered under part I and filed a
statement of qualification of limited liability partnership pursuant to this
subpart.

(b) All entities that were foreign limited
liability partnerships registered under the law in effect on the date preceding
July 1, 2000, shall be converted into and be deemed foreign limited liability
partnerships that have registered under part I and filed a statement of foreign
qualification pursuant to this subpart. [L 2000, c 218, pt of §1]

Revision Note

"July 1, 2000" substituted for "the effective
date of this subpart".

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next